Florida, session 2026, SB7048.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âParagraph (n) of subsection (1) and paragraph 29 (c) of subsection (2) of section 220.03, Florida Statutes, are 30 amended, and subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 31 220.03âDefinitions.â 32 (1)âSPECIFIC TERMS.âWhen used in this code, and when not 33 otherwise distinctly expressed or manifestly incompatible with 34 the intent thereof, the following terms shall have the following 35 meanings: 36 (n)ââInternal Revenue Codeâ means the United States 37 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended and in effect on 38 January 1, 2026 2025, except as provided in subsection (3). 39 (2)âDEFINITIONAL RULES.âWhen used in this code and neither 40 otherwise distinctly expressed nor manifestly incompatible with 41 the intent thereof: 42 (c)âAny term used in this code has the same meaning as when 43 used in a comparable context in the Internal Revenue Code and 44 other statutes of the United States relating to federal income 45 taxes, as such code and statutes are in effect on January 1, 46 2026 2025. However, if subsection (3) is implemented, the 47 meaning of a term shall be taken at the time the term is applied 48 under this code. 49 (6)âCOMPUTATION OF TAXABLE INCOME.âNotwithstanding any 50 other provision of this code, amendments to the Internal Revenue 51 Code of 1986, as amended by Pub. L. No. 119-21, which affect the 52 computation of taxable income for taxable years beginning before 53 January 1, 2026, may not be given effect under this code 54 retroactively to such effective date. A limitation, a deduction, 55 an expense, or an amortization may only affect the computation 56 of taxable income for taxable years beginning on or after 57 January 1, 2026, except as provided in this chapter. The 58 amendment to the Internal Revenue Code made by s. 70301 of Pub. 59 L. No. 119-21 is disregarded for taxable years beginning before 60 January 1, 2027, and a taxpayer must add to and deduct from 61 taxable income those amounts deducted for federal income tax 62 purposes as bonus depreciation in a manner consistent with s. 63 220.13(1)(e) and the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended 64 by s. 13201 of Pub. L. No. 115-97. 65 Section 2.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 66 220.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 67 220.13ââAdjusted federal incomeâ defined.â 68 (1)âThe term âadjusted federal incomeâ means an amount 69 equal to the taxpayerâs taxable income as defined in subsection 70 (2), or such taxable income of more than one taxpayer as 71 provided in s. 220.131, for the taxable year, adjusted as 72 follows: 73 (e)âAdjustments related to federal acts.âTaxpayers shall be 74 required to make the adjustments prescribed in this paragraph 75 for Florida tax purposes with respect to certain tax benefits 76 received pursuant to the Economic Stimulus Act of 2008; the 77 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009; the Small 78 Business Jobs Act of 2010; the Tax Relief, Unemployment 79 Insurance Reauthorization, and Job Creation Act of 2010; the 80 American Taxpayer Relief Act of 2012; the Tax Increase 81 Prevention Act of 2014; the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 82 2016; the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017; and the Coronavirus 83 Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act of 2020; and the One Big 84 Beautiful Bill Act of 2025. 85 1.a.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 86 equal to 100 percent of any amount deducted for federal income 87 tax purposes as bonus depreciation for the taxable year pursuant 88 to ss. 167 and 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 89 amended by s. 103 of Pub. L. No. 110-185; s. 1201 of Pub. L. No. 90 111-5; s. 2022 of Pub. L. No. 111-240; s. 401 of Pub. L. No. 91 111-312; s. 331 of Pub. L. No. 112-240; s. 125 of Pub. L. No. 92 113-295; s. 143 of Division Q of Pub. L. No. 114-113; and s. 93 13201 of Pub. L. No. 115-97, for property placed in service 94 after December 31, 2007, and before January 1, 2027. 95 b.âFor the taxable year and for each of the 6 subsequent 96 taxable years, there shall be subtracted from such taxable 97 income an amount equal to one-seventh of the amount by which 98 taxable income was increased pursuant to this subparagraph, 99 notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of the property 100 that is the subject of the adjustments and regardless of whether 101 such property remains in service in the hands of the taxpayer. 102 c.âThe provisions of sub-subparagraph b. do not apply to 103 amounts by which taxable income was increased pursuant to this 104 subparagraph for amounts deducted for federal income tax 105 purposes as bonus depreciation for qualified improvement 106 property as defined in s. 168(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code 107 of 1986, as amended by s. 13204 of Pub. L. No. 115-97. 108 2.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 109 equal to 100 percent of any amount in excess of $128,000 110 deducted for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year 111 pursuant to s. 179 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 112 amended by s. 102 of Pub. L. No. 110-185; s. 1202 of Pub. L. No. 113 111-5; s. 2021 of Pub. L. No. 111-240; s. 402 of Pub. L. No. 114 111-312; s. 315 of Pub. L. No. 112-240; and s. 127 of Pub. L. 115 No. 113-295, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 116 2007, and before January 1, 2015. For the taxable year and for 117 each of the 6 subsequent taxable years, there shall be 118 subtracted from such taxable income one-seventh of the amount by 119 which taxable income was increased pursuant to this 120 subparagraph, notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of 121 the property that is the subject of the adjustments and 122 regardless of whether such property remains in service in the 123 hands of the taxpayer. 124 3.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 125 equal to the amount of deferred income not included in such 126 taxable income pursuant to s. 108(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue 127 Code of 1986, as amended by s. 1231 of Pub. L. No. 111-5. There 128 shall be subtracted from such taxable income an amount equal to 129 the amount of deferred income included in such taxable income 130 pursuant to s. 108(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 131 as amended by s. 1231 of Pub. L. No. 111-5. 132 4.âFor taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018, and 133 before January 1, 2021, there shall be added to such taxable 134 income an amount equal to the excess, if any, of: 135 a.âOne hundred percent of any amount deducted for federal 136 income tax purposes as business interest expense for the taxable 137 year pursuant to s. 163(j) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 138 as amended by s. 2306 of Pub. L. No. 116-136; over 139 b.âOne hundred percent of the amount that would be 140 deductible for federal income tax purposes as business interest 141 expense for the taxable year if calculated pursuant to s. 163(j) 142 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended by s. 13301 of 143 Pub. L. No. 115-97. 144 145 Any expense added back pursuant to this subparagraph shall be 146 treated as a disallowed business expense carryforward from prior 147 years for the year or years following the addition, until such 148 time as the expense has been used. 149 5.âWith respect to qualified improvement property as 150 defined in s. 168(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 151 amended by s. 13204 of Pub. L. No. 115-97, that was placed in 152 service on or after January 1, 2018: 153 a.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 154 equal to 100 percent of any amount deducted for federal income 155 tax purposes under s. 167(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 156 1986. There shall be subtracted an amount equal to the amount of 157 depreciation that would have been deductible pursuant to s. 158 167(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect on January 159 1, 2020 and without regard to s. 2307 of Pub. L. No. 116-136, 160 notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of the property 161 that is the subject of the adjustments and regardless of whether 162 such property remains in service in the hands of the taxpayer. 163 b.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 164 the provisions of this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and 165 guidelines for computing depreciation on qualified improvement 166 property, as defined in s. 168(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue 167 Code of 1986. 168 6.âFor taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020, and 169 before January 1, 2026, the changes made to the Internal Revenue 170 Code by Pub. L. No. 116-260, Division EE, Title I, s. 116 and 171 Title II, s. 210 shall not apply to this chapter. Taxable income 172 under this section shall be calculated as though changes made by 173 those sections were not made to the Internal Revenue Code. The 174 Department of Revenue may adopt rules necessary to administer 175 the provisions of this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and 176 guidelines for treatment of expenses and depreciation related to 177 these changes. 178 7.a.âFor taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 179 2027, there shall be added to taxable income an amount equal to 180 100 percent of any amount deducted for the taxable year as bonus 181 depreciation pursuant to s. 70301 of Pub. L. No. 119-21 for 182 qualified property as defined in s. 168(k)(2) of the Internal 183 Revenue Code of 1986. 184 b.âFor the taxable year and for each of the 6 subsequent 185 taxable years, there shall be subtracted from such taxable 186 income an amount equal to one-seventh of the amount by which 187 taxable income was increased pursuant to this subparagraph, 188 notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of the property 189 that is the subject of the adjustments and regardless of whether 190 such property remains in service in the hands of the taxpayer. 191 c.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 192 this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and guidelines for 193 computing depreciation on property defined in this subparagraph. 194 8.a.âFor taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 195 2026, there shall be added to taxable income an amount equal to 196 100 percent of any amount deducted for the taxable year as bonus 197 depreciation pursuant to s. 70307 of Pub. L. No. 119-21 for 198 qualified production property as defined in s. 168(n)(2) of the 199 Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 200 b.âFor the taxable year and for each of the 6 subsequent 201 taxable years, there shall be subtracted from such taxable 202 income an amount equal to one-seventh of the amount by which 203 taxable income was increased pursuant to this subparagraph, 204 notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of the property 205 that is the subject of the adjustments and regardless of whether 206 such property remains in service in the hands of the taxpayer. 207 c.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 208 this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and guidelines for 209 computing depreciation on property defined in this subparagraph. 210 9.âFor taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 211 2026, the changes made to the Internal Revenue Code to s. 174 212 and the creation of s. 174A of the Internal Revenue Code by s. 213 70302 of Pub. L. No. 119-21 do not apply to this chapter. 214 a.âFor taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 215 2026, there shall be added to taxable income an amount equal to 216 100 percent of any amount deducted for s. 174 or s. 174A of the 217 Internal revenue Code. 218 b.âThere shall be subtracted from such taxable income an 219 amount that would have been deductible pursuant to s. 174 of the 220 Internal Revenue Code of 1986 had the amendments made to s. 174 221 and the creation of s. 174A of the Internal Revenue Code by s. 222 70302 of Pub. L. No. 119-21 not taken effect. 223 c.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 224 this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and guidelines for 225 computing the deduction related to these changes. 226 10.a.âFor taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 227 2026, there shall be added to such taxable income an amount 228 equal to 100 percent of any amount deducted for federal income 229 tax purposes pursuant to s. 179 of the Internal Revenue Code of 230 1986, as amended by s. 70306 of Pub. L. No. 119-21. 231 b.âFor the taxable year and for each of the 6 subsequent 232 taxable years, there shall be subtracted from such taxable 233 income one-seventh of the amount by which taxable income was 234 increased pursuant to this subparagraph, notwithstanding any 235 sale or other disposition of the property that is the subject of 236 the adjustments and regardless of whether such property remains 237 in service in the hands of the taxpayer. 238 c.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 239 this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and guidelines for 240 computing depreciation as provided in this subparagraph. 241 11.a.âFor taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 242 2026, there shall be added to such taxable income an amount 243 equal to 100 percent of any amount deducted for federal income 244 tax purposes pursuant to s. 274 of the Internal Revenue Code as 245 amended by s. 70305 of Pub. L. No. 119-21. 246 b.âThere shall be subtracted from such taxable income an 247 amount that would have been deductible pursuant to s. 274 of the 248 Internal Revenue Code of 1986 had the amendments by Pub. L. No. 249 119-21 to s. 274 of the Internal Revenue Code not taken effect. 250 c.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 251 this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and guidelines for 252 computing the deduction as provided in this subparagraph. 253 12.a.âFor taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 254 2026, there shall be added to such taxable income an amount 255 equal to 100 percent of any amount deducted for federal income 256 tax purposes pursuant to s. 163 of the Internal Revenue Code as 257 amended by s. 70303, s. 70341, and s. 70342 of Pub. L. No. 119 258 21. 259 b.âThere shall be subtracted from such taxable income an 260 amount that would have been deductible pursuant to s. 163 of the 261 Internal Revenue Code of 1986 had the amendments by Pub. L. No. 262 119-21 to s. 163 of the Internal Revenue Code not taken effect. 263 c.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 264 this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and guidelines for 265 computing the deduction as provided in this subparagraph. 266 13.7.âSubtractions available under this paragraph may be 267 transferred to the surviving or acquiring entity following a 268 merger or acquisition and used in the same manner and with the 269 same limitations as specified by this paragraph. 270 14.8.âThe additions and subtractions specified in this 271 paragraph are intended to adjust taxable income for Florida tax 272 purposes, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this code, 273 such additions and subtractions shall be permitted to change a 274 taxpayerâs net operating loss for Florida tax purposes. 275 Section 3.âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 220.03 276 and 220.13, Florida Statutes, operate retroactively to January 277 1, 2026. 278 Section 4.â(1)âThe Department of Revenue is authorized, 279 and all conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules 280 under s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of 281 administering this act. Notwithstanding any other law, emergency 282 rules adopted under this section are effective for 6 months 283 after adoption and may be renewed during the pendency of 284 procedures to adopt permanent rules addressing the subject of 285 the emergency rules. 286 (2)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 287 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.